Washington statutes.
RCW 39.58.155

Statewide custodian—Exemption from chapter.

A statewide custodian under RCW 43.08.280 may be exempted from the requirements of this chapter, based on rules adopted by the commission.

[ 2016 c 152 s 6; 1999 c 293 s 3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—1999 c 293: See notes following RCW 43.08.280.